New Jersey, session 222, S2713.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or a successor agency. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined pursuant to R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. Gas public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined pursuant to R.S.48:2-13, that distributes gas to end users within the State. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, an electric public utility or gas public utility that does business in this State shall file with the board an updated schedule of rates for approval, which schedule shall reflect utility rates equal to or less than the electric public utilitys or gas public utilitys rates at any point during the calendar year 2020. c.     The board shall approve an updated schedule of rates within 30 days of its receipt of the schedule. Upon the boards approval pursuant to this subsection, an updated schedule of rates shall remain in effect for a period of five years. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.